Louisiana, session 2026, HB1029.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:81.1(A) and 281.1(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
26:81.1(D) and 281.1(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§81.1. Limitation on issuance of permits
A. Beginning on August 1, 2025, and ending on December 31, 2026 2027,
no permits for the sale of alcoholic beverages under pursuant to this Chapter shall
be granted within the boundaries of District 3 of the Louisiana House of
Representatives.
* * *
D.(1) The provisions of this Section do not apply to a national chain of
restaurants or stores.
(2) For the purposes of this Section, the term "national chain" means a
company that operates in ten or more states.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1029 ENROLLED
§281.1. Limitation on issuance of permits
A. Beginning on August 1, 2025, and ending on December 31, 2026 2032,
no permits for the sale of alcoholic beverages under pursuant to this Chapter shall
be granted within the boundaries of District 3 of the Louisiana House of
Representatives.
* * *
D.(1) The provisions of this Section do not apply to a national chain of
restaurants or stores.
(2) For the purposes of this Section, the term "national chain" means a
company that operates in ten or more states.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.